New Jersey, session 222, S2633.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, a municipality shall not require a municipal beach tag or similar admission pass for access to the wet sandy beach below the mean high tide line, for an individual for the exclusive purpose of using the ocean for a recreational activity. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.